Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Retirement System for Judges and Commissioners

21.345.
Definitions.

For the purposes of KRS

21.350

to

21.510

, “retirement” means a voluntary resignation or a failure of reelection, but does not include a removal for cause.

The word “service” as used in KRS

21.370

to

21.480

means service transferred from the Kentucky Retirement Systems pursuant to KRS

21.370

(2), service as a city police judge purchased pursuant to KRS 21.370(3), and service as a Justice of the Supreme Court, as a Judge of the Court of Appeals created by Section 111 of the Constitution of Kentucky, as a regular Circuit Judge, or as a regular Judge of the District Court, including service in one (1) and then another of those capacities. It also includes service as a special Circuit Judge under the conditions described in subsection (3) of this section, as a Judge or commissioner of the former Court of Appeals, or as director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, prior to January 1, 1976, and service continuing beyond that date, in any capacity in or for the Court of Justice, by any person who held the office of commissioner of the former Court of Appeals, or director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, on December 31, 1975. The word “service” embraces only service performed while a member of the retirement system established by KRS

21.350

to

21.510

, except that service in any of the positions mentioned, before the Judicial Retirement System was made applicable to that category of position, and service transferred from the Kentucky Retirement Systems pursuant to KRS 21.370(2), shall be included.

For the purposes of KRS

21.345

to

21.510

, a “year” of service means a total of twelve (12) months of service, which need not be in the same calendar year. Service for any part of the calendar month in which the member’s term of service begins or ends shall be deemed to constitute a month of service.

The term “accumulated employer credit” as used in KRS

21.345

to

21.580

means the employer pay credit deposited to the member’s account and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS

21.402

.

The term “accumulated contributions” as used in KRS

21.345

to

21.580

, means:

For a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, the contributions made by the member to the Judicial Retirement Plan; and

For a member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan, the contributions made by the member to the Judicial Retirement Plan and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS

21.402

.

The term “accumulated account balance” as used in KRS

21.345

to

21.580

means:

For members who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, the member’s accumulated contributions; or

For members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS

21.402

, the combined sum of the member’s accumulated contributions and the member’s accumulated employer credit.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any director of the Administrative Office of the Courts appointed after January 1, 1976, nor shall they apply to any commissioner of the Court of Appeals not appointed prior to January 1, 1976. The administrative director of the courts and commissioners of the Court of Appeals appointed prior to January 1, 1976, shall continue to be members of the system so long as they continue to render service in any capacity in or for the Court of Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 5; 1962, ch. 9, § 2 (last sentence); 1974, ch. 85, § 1; 1976, ch. 62, § 14; 1978, ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 271, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 299, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 480, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 189, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 167, § 29, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 120, § 19, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.

21.347.
Judicial Retirement Plan — Judicial retirement fund — Established.

The Judicial Retirement System established by KRS

21.345

to

21.510

shall hereafter be designated and known as the Judicial Retirement Plan. There is established within that plan a state fund to be known as the judicial retirement fund, which shall consist of all money and securities of the Judicial Retirement System immediately prior to July 1, 1980; all allotments to be received of moneys theretofore appropriated to or for the Judicial Retirement System or Judicial Retirement Board and not yet allotted; all state appropriations to the judicial retirement fund or the Judicial Retirement Plan; all earnings from investment of the fund (including insurance benefits); and all contributions from members of the plan. The fund may have a subordinate administrative account. The benefits provided to be paid by reason of membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan shall not be chargeable to any other retirement fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 18, effective July 1, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 24, effective July 13, 1984.

21.350.
Establishment of system; membership.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, membership in the retirement system established by KRS

21.350

to

21.510

shall consist of, and be confined to, Justices of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Court of Appeals created by Section 111 of the Constitution of Kentucky, Circuit Judges, and Judges of the District Court, who have elected to participate in accordance with KRS

21.360

.

Any person who was a member on December 31, 1975, by virtue of holding on that date the office of commissioner of the former Court of Appeals or director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall continue in membership so long as he continues to render service in any capacity in or for the Court of Justice.

The limitation of membership made by this section does not affect rights to benefits based on service rendered before the 1978 amendment to this section took effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 1; 1978, ch. 193, § 2, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 196, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bivin, The Historical Developments of the Kentucky Courts, 47 Ky. L.J. 465 (1959).

21.355.
Membership. [Repealed.]

21.357.
Summary plan description — Publication — Recipients.

The Judicial Retirement Board shall prepare and furnish to all active members a summary plan description, written in a manner calculated to be understood by the members and beneficiaries, and sufficiently accurate and comprehensive to reasonably apprise them of their rights and obligations under the Judicial Retirement System.

The summary plan description shall include:

The name and address of the retirement system, the name of the manager, and the name and address of each member of the Judicial Retirement Board;

The name and address of the person designated for the service of legal process;

The system’s requirements for participation and benefits;

A description of retirement formulas for normal, early and disability retirement, and survivor benefits;

A description of the requirements for vesting of pension benefits;

A list of circumstances which would result in disqualification, ineligibility, or denial or loss of benefits;

The sources of financing retirement benefits, and statutory requirements for funding;

A statement after each actuarial valuation as to whether funding requirements are being met; and

The procedures to be followed in presenting claims for benefits under the plan, and the remedies available under the plan for the redress of claims which are denied in whole or in part.

The board may publish the summary plan description in the form of a comprehensive pamphlet or booklet, or in the form of periodic newsletters which shall incorporate all the information required in the summary plan description within a period of two (2) years. Any changes in statutory requirements or administrative practices which alter the provisions of the plan as described in the summary plan description shall be summarized as required in subsection (1) of this section and furnished to members in the form of a supplement to a comprehensive booklet, or reported in the periodic newsletter.

The board shall provide to retirees and beneficiaries so much of the summary plan description as they need to understand changes in benefits which apply to them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 246, § 14, effective July 15, 1980.

21.360.
Election to participate — Delayed election.

Each Judge of the District Court in office on July 1, 1978, may within thirty (30) days after that date, and any judge or justice of any court entitled to be a member thereafter taking office may within thirty (30) days after taking office, elect to make monthly contributions to the retirement system in an amount equal to:

Five percent (5%) of his or her monthly official salary, if the judge or justice became a member of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan prior to September 1, 2008;

Six percent (6%) of his or her monthly official salary, if the judge or justice became a member of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014; or

Six percent (6%) of his or her monthly official salary, if the judge or justice who becomes a member of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, which shall be used to fund benefits as follows:

Five percent (5%) of the monthly official salary shall be used to provide funding for benefits provided under KRS

21.402

; and

One percent (1%) of the monthly official salary to be used exclusively to help fund retiree health benefits as provided by KRS

21.427

and which shall not be refunded to the member if the member withdraws his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

21.460

. The deducted amounts under this subdivision shall be credited to an account established pursuant to 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(h)

, within the fund established by KRS

21.347

.

The election shall be effective to establish membership in the system as of July 1, 1978, or as of the date the judge or justice took office, as the case may be. The election shall be addressed to and filed with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and shall constitute an authorization by the member, to the secretary, to thereafter cause to be deducted from the member’s official salary, each month, the amount required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, as a voluntary contribution by the member towards the funding of the retirement system. For a member who began contributing to the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, the contribution shall continue until the judge or justice is vested in a service retirement allowance equal to one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation. Thereafter employee contributions shall be discontinued but continued service and retirement benefits shall not be affected thereby.

A judge or justice entitled to elect membership in the retirement system who failed to elect membership within thirty (30) days after taking office in 1980 or who elected membership in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System may elect membership not later than August 31, 2005. An election, upon being made pursuant to this section, shall operate to create an inviolable contract between the member entitled to elect membership under this subsection and the Commonwealth, guaranteeing to and vesting in the member the rights and benefits provided for under the terms and conditions of KRS

21.350

to

21.510

.

When any judge makes a delayed election of membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan under subsection (2) of this section, his or her active membership in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall terminate, as of the date his or her membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan becomes effective, and any credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, earned for service as a judge, which he or she then has or which he or she subsequently regains while being an active member of the Judicial Retirement Plan, shall be transferred to and counted as service credit in the Judicial Retirement Plan, and shall no longer constitute credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, except for the purpose of validating any other credit in that system, if the member pays the difference, if any, between the amount transferred from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System and the actuarial value of the transferred service.

Any credit he or she then has in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, earned for service in any capacity other than a judge, shall not be affected. Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS

61.680

to the contrary, final compensation used to determine benefits for any service credit remaining in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall be based on the highest years of compensation as a judge whether the years occur before or after the judge elects membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan.

No person may attain credit in more than one (1) of the retirement plans or systems mentioned in this section for the same period of service. When credit is transferred from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to the Judicial Retirement Plan, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall transfer to the Judicial Retirement Fund an amount equal to the employee’s and employer’s contributions attributable to that credit, together with interest on the contributions from the date made to the date of transfer at the actuarially-assumed interest rate of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System in effect at the time the contributions were made, compounded annually at that same interest rate.

Membership and benefit rights for judges and justices other than judges of the District Court, and for the commissioners and administrative director, who took office prior to July 1, 1978, shall be dependent upon valid elections having been made under this section and KRS

21.355

and

21.365

prior to the 1978 amendment to this section. The terms of such elections, including the contribution rate, shall continue to govern for the duration of the member’s service.

When any Judge of the District Court in office on July 1, 1978, elects membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan in accordance with this section, his or her membership in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall terminate as of July 1, 1978, and any credit in that system he or she earned for service as a judge of the District Court shall be nullified; provided that the effect of such service to validate any other service credit in that system shall not be nullified.

The state shall, solely for the purpose of compliance with Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, pick up the employee contributions required by this section for all compensation earned after August 1, 1982, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and KRS

141.010

. The picked-up employee contribution shall satisfy all obligations to the retirement system satisfied prior to August 1, 1982, by the employee contribution, and the picked-up employee contribution shall be in lieu of an employee contribution. The state shall pay these picked-up employee contributions from the same source of funds which is used to pay earnings to the employee. The employee shall have no option to receive the contributed amounts directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the system. Employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, shall be treated for all purposes of KRS

21.345

to

21.570

in the same manner and to the same extent as employee contributions made prior to August 1, 1982.

An election once made under this section, either to participate or not to participate in the Judicial Retirement Plan, shall be considered to apply, to all future service in any office covered by the plan, whether such service is in the same or a different office, and whether or not it is continuous.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1978, ch. 193, § 3, effective July 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 166, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 458, § 9, effective April 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 25, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 360, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. VII D, § 642, effective April 11, 1990; 1994, ch. 266, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 86, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2008 (1st. Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5, effective June 27, 2008; 2013, ch. 120, § 20, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 171, § 65, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 65, effective April 27, 2018; 2018 ch. 107, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 7, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

Compiler's Notes.

KRS

21.355

and

21.365

referred to in subsection (4) of this section were repealed by Acts 1978, ch. 193, § 10.

Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, referred to in (6), may be found as 26 USCS § 414(h).

21.365.
Circuit judges and director of administrative office of the courts entitled to participate. [Repealed.]

21.370.
Term of service to qualify if member began participating before January 1, 2014 — Transfer of service credit to Judicial Retirement Plan — Purchase of service credit for service as police judge and for military service — Special provisions for active members.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of KRS

21.410

and in subsection (2) of KRS

21.420

, no benefits shall be payable under KRS

21.350

to

21.480

to any member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, or to his surviving spouse, unless he has completed at least eight (8) years of service, including service before becoming a member.

No surviving spouse of a retired member shall be entitled to any benefits unless the person was the spouse of the member at the time he retired.

A member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has qualified for benefits under this section may transfer to the Judicial Retirement Plan up to ten (10) years of service credit which he has earned in a retirement system administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems, and he may transfer to the Judicial Retirement Plan up to ten (10) years of service credit which he has earned in the Kentucky Legislators’ Retirement Plan. If the member elects to transfer his service credit, the system or plan from which the transfer is made shall transfer to the judicial retirement fund an amount equal to the employee’s and employer’s contributions attributable to that credit, together with interest on the contributions from the date made to the date of transfer at the actuarially assumed interest rate of the system or plan from which the transfer is made in effect at the time the contributions were made, compounded annually at that same interest rate. The member shall be entitled to the transferred service credit, at the rate at which he qualifies under KRS

21.400

, when he pays the total difference between the amount of the funds transferred and the cost of the credit to the Judicial Retirement Plan, as determined by the actuary for the Judicial Retirement Plan. The member may pay by transfer, if authorized under subsection (5)(d) of this section, or by lump sum or increments as set forth in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

Any active member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan under subsection (1) of this section or KRS

21.375

, shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years for his period of service as a city police judge for a city within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, if the service was performed prior to the first Monday in January, 1978, and if the service has not been credited to the member’s account with any other public defined benefit plan, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The period of service to be purchased shall be certified to the board of trustees by the custodian of the records of the city for which the service was performed. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate which applies to the member in question under KRS

21.400

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

Any active member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan under subsection (1) of this section or KRS

21.375

, or his beneficiary acting in his place if the member dies prior to retirement, shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years for his period of service in the Armed Forces of the United States, if his discharge therefrom is honorable and he has not been credited with the service by any other retirement system administered by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, by paying the retirement system thirty-five percent (35%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate which applies to the member in question under KRS

21.400

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan.
(4) (a) 1. Any active member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan under subsection (1) of this section or KRS

21.375

, or his beneficiary acting in his place if the member dies prior to retirement, shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years for his period of service in the Armed Forces of the United States, if his discharge therefrom is honorable and he has not been credited with the service by any other retirement system administered by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, by paying the retirement system thirty-five percent (35%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate which applies to the member in question under KRS

21.400

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan.

Any active member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan may purchase and receive service credit for one (1) month of service for each six (6) months of service in the reserves or the National Guard by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the member in question as provided in KRS 21.400. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The service in the military reserves or the National Guard shall be treated as service earned prior to participation in the plan. The purchase can be made by the member in a transfer, if authorized under subsection (5)(d) of this section, or by a lump-sum payment or installment payments. The payment shall not be picked up by the employer as provided in KRS 21.360(6).

The member, if the member began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may purchase all of his military service credit at one (1) time, or in increments of no less than one (1) year, unless there is a fraction remaining after all full years have been paid for. Payment of the total or the increment may be made by lump sum or by monthly installments through payroll deduction. If the member chooses to pay by installment, the cost of the service credit shall be computed in the same manner as for a lump-sum payment, which shall be the principal. Interest, at the annual actuarial rate in effect at the time each payment is made, shall be added to each monthly payment at the rate of one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual interest rate applied to the declining principal amount. Installment purchases shall be for no less than twelve (12) nor more than sixty (60) months. If the member leaves office before completing his installment payments, he may satisfy his contract by a lump-sum payment of the remaining principal amount, but no further installment payments shall be accepted thereafter. In this case, the member shall be credited with the military service credit for which he has paid, in years or months but no fraction less than a full month, and any payment remaining after credit for full months has been awarded shall be returned to the member.

The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

Any active member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan under subsection (1) of this section or KRS

21.375

shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years each for his period of service as a Domestic Relations Commissioner, a Master Commissioner, or a District Court Trial Commissioner of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or a combination thereof, if the service has not been credited to the member’s account with any other public defined benefit plan, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The period of service to be purchased shall be certified to the board of trustees by the custodian of the records. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the member in question under KRS

21.400

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The member may pay by transfer as set forth in paragraph (d) of this subsection, or by lump sum or increments as set forth in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

Any active member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan under subsection (1) of this section or KRS

21.375

shall receive service credit for his period of service to the United States Government, other than service in the Armed Forces, if the service has not been credited to the member’s account with any other public defined benefit plan, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The period of service to be purchased shall be certified to the board of trustees by the custodian of the records. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the member in question under KRS

21.400

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The member may pay by transfer as set forth in paragraph (d) of this subsection, or by lump sum or increments as set forth in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

Any member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who was in office on June 21, 2001, and who was in active contributing status to the applicable retirement plan on June 21, 2001, and who has at least one hundred eighty (180) months of service credit may purchase a combined maximum total of five (5) years retirement service credit that is not otherwise purchasable, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the member in question under KRS 21.400. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Judicial Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan, except that the service purchased under this subsection shall not be used in determining a retirement allowance until the member has accrued at least two hundred forty (240) months of service, excluding service purchased under this subsection. If the member does not accrue at least two hundred forty (240) months of service, excluding service purchased under this subsection, then upon retirement, death, or written request following termination, the payment shall be refunded. The member may pay by transfer as set forth in paragraph (d) of this subsection, or by lump sum or increments as set forth in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

A member of the Judicial Retirement Plan may purchase service credit under the provisions of this section by transferring funds through a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer permitted under the applicable sections of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder, or through a direct rollover as contemplated by and permitted under 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(31)

. Service credit may also be purchased by a rollover of funds pursuant to and permitted under the rules specified in 26

U.S.C. sec. 402(c)

and 26

U.S.C. sec. 408(d)(3)

. The Judicial Retirement Fund shall accept the transfer or rollover to the extent permitted under the rules specified in the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations and rulings issued thereunder. The amount shall be credited to the individual member’s contribution account and shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 21.360(6).

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 3; 1962, ch. 9, § 4; 1974, ch. 386, § 2; 1990, ch. 480, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 266, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 389, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 146, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 90, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 258, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 86, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 120, § 21, effective July 1, 2013.

21.372.
Limitations and exclusions on increases in final compensation for members retiring on or after January 1, 2018 — Exception for bona fide promotion or career development — Exclusion — Determination by board — Administrative regulations — Inapplicability to hybrid cash balance plan participants.

For purposes of this section:

“Bona fide promotion or career advancement”:

Means a professional advancement in substantially the same line of work held by the member in the four (4) years immediately prior to the final sixty (60) months preceding retirement or a change in employment position based on the training, skills, education, or expertise of the member that imposes a significant change in job duties and responsibilities to clearly justify the increased compensation to the member, including any circumstance when a member is elected or appointed to another court within the Court of Justice; and

Does not include any circumstance where a judge or justice participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan takes a position of employment with an employer participating in any of the other state-administered retirement systems; and

“Year” has the same meaning as in KRS 21.345(3).

For members retiring on or after January 1, 2018, the plan shall identify any consecutive year utilized in determining the member’s final compensation in which the member’s compensation increased at a rate of ten percent (10%) or more over the member’s compensation in the immediately preceding year.

Except as limited or excluded by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any amount of increase in compensation for a year identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection that exceeds ten percent (10%) more than the member’s compensation from the immediately preceding year shall not be used in the calculation of the member’s final compensation for the purposes of determining the member’s monthly pension benefit under KRS

21.400

.

If the member’s final compensation is reduced for the purposes of determining the member’s pension benefit under KRS

21.400

as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the retirement system shall, notwithstanding KRS

21.460

and as applicable, refund the member contributions attributable to the reduction in creditable compensation.

In order to ensure the prospective application of the potential reduction in pension benefits as provided in subsection (2) of this section, only the compensation earned by the retiring member on or after July 1, 2017, shall be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section. Compensation earned by the retiring member prior to July 1, 2017, shall not be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section.

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to increases that are the direct result of a bona fide promotion or career advancement or to compensation used in accordance with KRS 61.680(7) in which the member does not have sixty (60) months of service in the Judicial Retirement Plan.

The board of trustees shall determine whether increases in compensation during the final sixty (60) months preceding retirement constitute a bona fide promotion or career advancement and may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section. All state-administered retirement systems shall cooperate to implement this section.

This section shall not apply to employees participating in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS

21.402

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 125, § 2, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 6, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 102, § 41, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.